Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Lease of Real Property

56.800.
Finance and Administration Cabinet responsible for leasing of all property for state use.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be responsible for the lease of all real property rentals required for use by all departments, agencies, and administrative bodies of the state government listed in KRS Chapter 12 that do not have statutory authority to lease property, and no lease of real property shall be binding against the Commonwealth or any agency unless made and entered into as provided in KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 231, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 98, effective April 9, 1980; 1990, ch. 512, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 63, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 44, effective June 25, 2009.

56.802.
Request for space by agency — Determination of need by department for facilities management — Advertisement for leasing proposals — Award of lease by commissioner — Limited judicial review — Report to capital projects and bond committee. [Repealed.]

56.803.
Procedure when agency requests space.

When an agency determines that it will need office or other space, the agency shall submit a request for the acquisition of the additional space to the Department for Facilities Management in the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Except in the case of an emergency as described at KRS 56.805(3), an agency shall submit its space request in writing to the department. In the case of an emergency, an agency shall communicate its space needs to the department pursuant to KRS 56.805(3) as soon as an agency knows that it will need the space. If the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management determines that insufficient space has been allocated to the agency making the request and that it is appropriate to lease additional space for the agency making the request, the commissioner shall acquire the space required by lease as provided by KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

.

The Department for Facilities Management shall review each agency space request to determine whether space suitable to meet the agency’s reasonable needs may be available in a state-owned or occupied building. If it is determined that there is suitable space available in a state-owned or occupied building, the commissioner shall notify the agency. A copy of the notice shall be kept on file.

If it is determined that there is no suitable space available in a state-owned or occupied building, the department shall comply with the procedures set forth in this section in the leasing of space, except as otherwise provided in KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

.

The department shall draw up general requirement specifications for the space required. These general requirement specifications shall not be changed except, at the discretion of the commissioner, when the lease process is initiated again pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (15) of this section or pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (16) of this section. The general requirement specifications shall be kept on file.

In soliciting the interest of lessors who have property to let in a county where space is sought, the department shall give adequate public notice to reasonably inform persons having property to let within the county of the type of space required, the general location of the property, and the number of square feet needed. The notice may include posting on the Internet or newspaper advertisements. Each notice shall contain general information concerning the agency requirements for the space sought and shall state the last time, date, and place that written responses shall be received. When it is anticipated that a lease may be negotiated containing deviations or variations from the terms and conditions of the state standard lease form prescribed by the Division of Real Properties, within the department, any deviations or variations shall be stated in the notice.

The Department for Facilities Management may use any means available to notify landlords that a notice has been given.

A property owner, or his representative, shall respond in writing on or before the time and date designated in the notice and shall state in the writing the type and location of the property, the name and address of the property owner, and the date of availability of the property. The department shall deal only with individuals who have submitted written responses on or before the time and date designated in the notice.

All written responses received on or before the time and date designated shall be opened or downloaded at the same time, publicly read or posted, and kept on file by the department.

Within ten (10) business days of the opening of written responses, the department shall transmit general requirement specifications to each person who submitted a written response on or before the time and date designated. The same general requirement specifications shall be transmitted to each person. The department shall state whether a reverse auction will be used to determine any terms of the proposals and shall specify the procedures for the reverse auction.

After the general requirement specifications have been transmitted, except as provided in paragraph (a) of subsection (13) of this section, the commissioner, and department employees under his supervision, may negotiate with persons who submitted written responses on or before the time and date designated. If in the course of negotiations, a person proposes terms and conditions of lease different from those contained in the state standard lease form which are determined to be in the Commonwealth’s best interest to accept, but no mention of the acceptability thereof has been made in the notice given pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, all other persons who submitted written responses on or before the time and date designated shall be notified of the terms and conditions and shall be allowed to incorporate the terms and conditions in written proposals when submitted pursuant to subsection (12) of this section. A copy of each notice shall be kept on file.

The department shall inspect each space proposed to be leased to determine its suitability to the reasonable needs of the agency for whose use the property is sought. The owner of the property, or the owner’s representative, shall provide access to the property for the inspection. A report of the findings about each property inspected shall be submitted on a site evaluation form to the commissioner of the department. Completed site evaluation forms shall be kept on file.

After the commissioner has reviewed the completed site evaluation forms, the commissioner shall inform each owner of property, or his representative, of the steps necessary to bring the property up to general and specific requirement specifications. The commissioner shall also invite each person to submit a written proposal on a form created by the Department for Facilities Management. A copy of the form shall be provided to each bidder. The department may require any terms of the proposal to be the subject of a reverse auction. A written proposal shall constitute a best and final offer. The department shall not consider a written proposal unless it is submitted on a department form on or before the time and date designated.

All written portions of the proposals submitted on or before the time and date designated shall be opened at the same time, publicly identified by the name of the property owner and the location of the property, and kept on file.

Except pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (15) of this section, when the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply, from the time that written proposals are opened until the awarding of a lease, the department:

Shall not negotiate or agree to changes in the terms of written proposals except to correct technical errors;

Shall log in all contacts between department employees and any person with an interest in the awarding of a lease. The log shall state the time, date, place, and a summary of the substance of each contact. Each log entry shall be signed by the department employee who was contacted. After the lease is awarded, the log shall be kept as a department record.

The commissioner shall assess the proposals, taking into account factors including, but not limited to: consultation with the head of the agency for whose use the space is sought; the location and accessibility of the property to the public; its condition and state of repair; its conformity with the requirements of occupational health and safety regulations; its conformity with applicable state fire, health, safety and sanitation requirements; the proposed rental rates; utility and janitorial costs; agency moving costs; any terms of the proposal determined through a reverse auction; and whether the property proposed is in substantial conformity with the general and specific requirement specifications.

The commissioner shall give preference to properties in areas which have received, within the previous five (5) year period, state community development funds for revitalization if properties are offered at a competitive rate and meet the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The commissioner, relying exclusively on his assessment made pursuant to subsection (14) of this section, shall:

Choose the best proposal in the interest of the Commonwealth;

Be permitted to negotiate with a potential lessor if he was the only responsive and responsible potential lessor who submitted a proposal; or

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, reject all proposals when none is in the Commonwealth’s best interest to accept as assessed according to the factors stated in subsection (14) of this section and may, at his discretion, initiate the lease process again.

The commissioner shall award or decline to award a lease to the potential lessor who submitted the best proposal pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (15) of this section or who negotiated with the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (15) of this section. However, the commissioner shall not award a lease to a potential lessor who negotiated with the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (15) of this section if that potential lessor’s proposal after negotiations was not in the Commonwealth’s best interest to accept as assessed according to the factors stated in subsection (14) of this section, and the commissioner shall not award a lease to a person other than a potential lessor prescribed in this paragraph.

If the commissioner declines to award a lease, he may, at his discretion, initiate the lease process again.

The commissioner shall put in writing the justifications for his decisions made pursuant to subsections (15) and (16) of this section. This writing shall be kept on file.

The commissioner, all department employees under the commissioner’s supervision who performed a site evaluation or negotiated a lease agreement under this section, the head of the agency that will occupy the leased space, and all agency employees who were directly involved with a site evaluation or lease negotiations shall sign separate certificates, devised by the commissioner, which shall provide the signatory with the option of certifying that, to the best of his knowledge, he is either aware or unaware of circumstances which may constitute a violation of KRS

56.800

to

56.823

. The Department for Facilities Management shall keep the certificates on file and shall inform state agencies of the legal requirements concerning lease certification on an annual basis.

The department shall notify each person who submitted a written response on or before the time and date designated in the public notice pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, but who was not awarded the lease, of the selected property to be leased, and that the person has a right to examine the leasing records relevant to the lease that was awarded. If the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, pursuant to KRS 56.823(2), will review the awarding of a lease, each notice shall state that fact. A copy of each notice shall be kept on file.

Prior to finalization of the lease, the department or the leasing agency shall inspect the property to ensure that any changes described in subsection (11) of this section necessary to bring the property up to specifications have been completed in a manner satisfactory to the agency or department. At the conclusion of the inspection, the owner shall be advised in writing by the department either that the property is approved for occupancy and the lease may be finalized, or that there remain changes to be completed or corrected before the lease may be finalized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 343, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 120, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 539, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 63, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 45, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 63, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(9/19/97). An erroneous reference to KRS 58.823 in subsection (3) of this statute has been corrected to read KRS

56.823

to correct an inadvertent mistake in codifying 1990 Ky. Acts ch. 512, sec. 4.

56.8035.
Conditions under which proposal to lease, lease-purchase, or exercise options to purchase new construction may be considered.

When the Department for Facilities Management solicits for procurement of leased office space under the provisions of KRS

56.803

, a proposal for new construction shall be considered if it does not contain any provision for a lease-purchase or an option to purchase.

The Department for Facilities Management shall only consider a proposal for construction of leased office space with provision for lease-purchase or option to purchase if the proposal is submitted in response to a solicitation for proposals for built-to-suit leases in accordance with KRS

56.8169

.

A building constructed and leased to the Commonwealth under this section shall be constructed:

In accordance with all applicable state and national safety, building, and construction code requirements; and

To last for a minimum of thirty (30) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 539, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 63, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

56.804.
Newspaper advertising not required, when. [Repealed.]

56.805.
Lease of space in building owned by a governmental unit or space required because of emergency.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 56.803(4) to (19), this section shall govern the leasing of space in a building owned by the federal government, by a political subdivision or municipal corporation of the Commonwealth, or if the space is required as the result of a bona fide emergency.

When the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management determines that it is in the Commonwealth’s best interest for him to negotiate a lease in a building owned by the federal government or by a political subdivision or municipal corporation of the Commonwealth, he shall do so. The commissioner shall state in writing his justifications for the determination, and the writing shall be kept on file.

A bona fide emergency shall be deemed to exist only in cases where the head of an agency already occupying leased premises certifies in writing to the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that:

The leased premises have been damaged or destroyed by fire, windstorm, or other casualty; or

The leased premises are found to be in violation of regulations of the Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission, and the violations cannot be remedied within thirty (30) days after the issuance of a citation to the lessor of the premises; or

The leased premises are found to be unsafe or unfit for occupancy due to any condition constituting a violation or infraction of fire or health laws and regulations and cannot be made safe within a reasonable time; or

The necessity for leased premises arises from the enactment or adoption of federal legislation or regulations or state legislation, the effective date of which mandates commencement of programs to be housed in leased space before there is time for space to be acquired by public notice; and

The agency’s functions will be impaired or have to be discontinued unless other quarters to house the agency’s operations are immediately located and occupied by the agency; or

An emergency, other than one described in paragraph (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, exists, and the Governor has given his express written authorization of an emergency lease. The certificate shall state the details of the emergency, and the head of the agency shall include the Governor’s written authorization along with the certificate sent to the Secretary of Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Upon receipt by the Finance and Administration Cabinet of the certificate, written pursuant to paragraph (a), (b), (c), or (d) of subsection (3) of this section, or the certificate and the Governor’s authorization written pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of this section, the Department for Facilities Management shall take the action to locate and negotiate for the lease of space meeting the certifying agency’s reasonable needs. As appropriate, the department shall keep the certificate or the certificate and the Governor’s written authorization on file.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 120, § 28, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 539, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 120 and 539 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

56.806.
Terms of lease — Calculation of rent — Option to purchase — Lease-purchase agreement — Right to cancel lease.

Except when another lease term is approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the terms of all leases entered into pursuant to KRS

56.803

or

56.805

may provide for an initial lease term beginning on a date stated and ending on June 30 in each year in which the General Assembly has convened in an even-numbered-year regular session and appropriated funds for the operation of the state government during the next ensuing biennium. The leases may grant the state successive options for the automatic renewal of the lease upon the same terms and conditions for additional renewal periods of twenty-four (24) months each, not to exceed three (3) automatic renewal periods. Any lease containing provision for the automatic renewal of the lease after the expiration of the initial lease term shall also provide that the state may, upon written notice given to the lessor on or before April 15 of the year in which the initial or any automatic renewal term expires, elect not to exercise its option for the automatic renewal of the lease term. Subject to the agreement of the lessor, a lease in which the final automatic renewal period has expired, or will expire as of the end of the then current term, may be renewed upon the same terms and conditions, provisions of KRS

56.803

to the contrary notwithstanding.

The Department for Facilities Management shall comply with the provisions of this subsection when calculating rentable area for the purposes of a lease.

If the Commonwealth is the only tenant on a single floor of a multistory building, the rentable area shall be the entire area described by measuring to the inside finished surface of the dominant portion of the permanent outer building walls, excluding any major vertical penetrations of the floor which shall include, but not be limited to, stairways, elevator shafts, pipe chases, vertical air ducts, and the enclosing wall of all such excluded areas. Restrooms, corridors, and utility rooms which exclusively serve the floor occupied by the Commonwealth shall be included as part of the rentable area.

If the Commonwealth is the only tenant in a one (1) story or multistory building, rentable area shall be calculated pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection except that those areas excluded pursuant to paragraph (a) shall be included as part of the rentable area.

If the Commonwealth shares a floor with one (1) or more other tenants, the rentable area shall be calculated by measuring from the inside finished surface of the dominant portion of the permanent outer building walls to the office side of every corridor wall or other wall separating the Commonwealth’s leased space from other adjacent rentable areas which shall include, but not be limited to, space under the control of another tenant, public corridors, restrooms, all common service and utility areas, stairways, elevator shafts, vertical pipe chases, and air ducts.

The Commonwealth’s rentable area determined pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall include columns and projections necessary to the building.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may include in a lease an option to purchase the leased property or a lease-purchase of the leased property.

If the Finance and Administration Cabinet exercises an option to purchase leased property, the option price shall not exceed the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth enter into the option. Two (2) competent and qualified real estate appraisers shall each determine the fair market value. Each real estate appraiser shall be selected by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall employ an accepted appraisal technique.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if the Finance and Administration Cabinet includes in a lease the lease-purchase of the leased property, two (2) competent and qualified real estate appraisers shall each determine the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth enter into the lease. Each appraiser shall be selected by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall employ an accepted appraisal technique. The lease shall provide for an initial lease term ending June 30 of the second year of the then current fiscal biennium of the Commonwealth, with the option of the Commonwealth, as lessee, to extend the term of the lease for a term of two (2) years from the expiration of each extended term of the lease, until the original term of the lease has been extended for a total number of years agreed upon by the parties. The agreed rental paid for the original term and for each of the full number of years for which the term of the lease may be extended shall amortize the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease. The lease shall provide that the Commonwealth may, at the expiration of the original or any extended term, purchase the leased property at a stated price, which shall be the balance of the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lease was entered into which has not been amortized by the payments of rent previously made by the Commonwealth.

If the Finance and Administration Cabinet includes lease-purchase of the leased property in a lease with the federal government, the terms of the lease-purchase shall be determined through negotiations between the Commonwealth and the federal government.

Except when a lease incorporates a lease-purchase pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the Commonwealth shall reserve the right to cancel a lease upon written notice within thirty (30) days.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 231, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 512, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 44, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 63, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 58, § 12, effective June 21, 2001.

56.808.
Modification of lease. [Repealed.]

56.809.
Statement of owners of property to be furnished to cabinet — New statement required under certain conditions.

When the owner of real property selected to be leased to the Commonwealth is a corporation, partnership, business trust, or organization, a disclosure statement providing a list of the names of all persons owning five percent (5%) or more of the shares in such entities and the names of all partners, including silent and limited partners, shall be furnished to the Finance and Administration Cabinet prior to the execution of the lease agreement.

Any person, corporation, partnership, business trust, or organization which receives income from the lease of real property to the Commonwealth and then, by way of assignment, transfer, or any other direct or indirect means, conveys some part of that income to any other person, corporation, partnership, business trust, or organization shall file a disclosure statement with the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The disclosure statement shall identify each recipient of the income and the amount received by each recipient.

A new disclosure statement shall be furnished to the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon:

Any change or transfer of ownership involving persons, including silent or limited partners, owning five percent (5%) or more of the shares in the corporation, partnership, business trust, or organization; or

Any change in the distribution of income from the leased property by way of assignment, transfer, or any other direct or indirect means.

The Department for Facilities Management shall maintain each disclosure statement obtained pursuant to this section in the appropriate lease file and shall make all lease files available for public inspection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

56.810.
Calculation of amount of rent. [Repealed.]

56.811.
Regulations providing manner of calculating rent — Report of modification of existing lease to capital projects and bond oversight committee. [Repealed.]

56.812.
Lists of owners of property to be furnished to cabinet. [Repealed.]

56.813.
Request for additional space — Improvements in premises — Use of funds to improve leased building that state will own at end of lease term — Amendment or modification of leases — Emergency modification — Register of proposed lease modifications.

An agency may request that the Finance and Administration Cabinet provide additional space in a building in which space is already leased by the state. If the cabinet determines there is need for more space, the current lease may be amended, with agreement of the lessor, to increase the leased space. However, the rental rate paid for the additional space shall not exceed the square foot rental rate fixed by the original lease. A lease may also be modified with agreement of the lessor to decrease the number of square feet leased and the rent shall be appropriately reduced.

When an agency occupying leased premises desires improvements in the premises, the agency shall obtain the cabinet secretary’s approval for the improvements at an estimated cost before the lessor makes the improvements.
(2) (a) 1. When an agency occupying leased premises desires improvements in the premises, the agency shall obtain the cabinet secretary’s approval for the improvements at an estimated cost before the lessor makes the improvements.

If the improvements cost more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the agency shall obtain the cabinet secretary’s approval for the rent increase necessary to amortize the cost of the improvements in full over the life of the lease. No other financing method shall be used.

If the improvements cost ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less, the agency shall obtain the cabinet secretary’s approval for the dollar amount necessary to pay for the cost of the improvements at direct state expense or the rent increase necessary to amortize the cost of the improvements in full over a period of time which shall run no longer that the life of the lease. No other financing method shall be used. No improvement shall be artificially divided so as to qualify under the provisions of this subparagraph.

Any improvements approved under this subparagraph with a cost between one thousand dollars ($1,000) and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be reported semiannually by the Finance and Administration Cabinet to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee established by KRS

45.790

. The report shall include, for each project, the agency for which the improvement was made, the cost, a description of the work performed, and the property identification number.

Any rent increase necessary to amortize a cost pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not extend beyond the period required to accomplish the agreed amortization.

The cabinet secretary shall amend a lease to reflect a rent increase necessary to amortize a cost pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, and the amendment shall state that the rent increase is for the purpose of amortizing this cost.

For any building leased by a state agency that the state will own upon termination of the lease or expiration of the lease term, and for which no modification of the lease may be made to amortize improvements to the property, the cabinet may use funds provided by state agencies to improve, renovate, or refit the building to better satisfy the needs of the agencies occupying the leased property up to six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) without additional approval of the General Assembly.

Any modification to an existing lease which is required because of an emergency as described at KRS 56.805(3) shall be made pursuant to KRS 56.805(3) and (4) and this section.

The Division of Real Properties, within the Department for Facilities and Support Services, shall maintain a register of all proposed lease modifications which, if approved, will result in the payment of a square foot rate for the leased space which is greater than the square foot rate contained in the original lease. All such proposed modifications shall be filed and kept in the register for public inspection and comment for thirty (30) calendar days. Comments received from the public during the period shall be considered before the lease modification is executed by the parties and becomes binding against the Commonwealth. After receiving comments, if the secretary determines that the proposed modifications are not in the interest of the Commonwealth, he or she may require the agency to continue operation in its present space or cancel the lease and seek more suitable space. The lessor, under any lease proposed to be modified as contemplated therein, shall be advised of the requirements of this subsection and cautioned that the Commonwealth shall have no liability for any action undertaken by the lessor in anticipation of, but prior to execution of, the modifications of the lease.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 339, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 177, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, § 81, effective June 20, 2005; 2014, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 103, § 1, effective March 21, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2014). In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has altered the numbering within subsection (2) of this statute from the way it appeared in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 80, sec. 1, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(c).

56.8135.
Annual report by agency if space reconfigured, use changed, or number of employees occupying space changed for state-owned or leased property.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, in September of each year, every agency shall report to the Finance and Administration Cabinet concerning any state-owned or leased property if, in the preceding twelve (12) months, the agency has:

Reconfigured ten percent (10%) more of the space; or

Changed the use of ten percent (10%) or more of the space; or

Changed the number of employees occupying the space by ten percent (10%) or more.

An agency’s report shall include:

The address of the property;

The percentage of space which the agency reconfigured or changed the use of; or

The percentage change in the number of employees;

The factors which prompted the reconfiguration, change in use, or change in number of employees; and

Any other relevant information requested by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The provisions of this section shall not apply when the property involved covers less than one thousand (1,000) square feet.

This section shall expire July 13, 1998.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 33, §§ 1 and 2, effective July 15, 1994.

56.814.
Employees forbidden to disclose information prior to advertisement.

No officer or employee of any state agency shall engage in any act or make any representation or commitment to any person relative to the lease of any real property by the state without specific written authorization from and approval by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and neither the state nor the department shall be bound by the act, representation, or commitment unless so authorized and approved.

No officer or employee of any state agency shall disclose to any person or firm who might reasonably be expected to submit a proposal, any approved plans by the department for the lease of real property for which public notice is required under KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

prior to the public notice. Discussions of approved leasing plans may be held after public notice with persons interested in submitting a proposal pertaining to the space requirements.

If all of the proposals, submitted in response to the advertisement referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection, are rejected, then the requirements of paragraph (a) shall govern disclosure before, and discussions after, new advertisements are placed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 231, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 512, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 120, § 29, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 539, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 46, effective June 25, 2009.

56.816.
Built-to-suit leases — Advertisement — Specifications. [Repealed.]

56.8161.
Determination that agency is entitled to use built-to-suit to acquire space — Definitions.

If the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet determines that an agency is entitled to additional space and that built-to-suit on private property or built-to-suit on state-owned land is the most economically advantageous method for acquiring that space, the secretary shall set forth his determination in a written finding which shall be approved by the Governor. The following definitions shall apply to built-to-suit projects:

“Design-build-finance” means a built-to-suit project delivery method in which the chief purchasing officer enters into a single procurement and contract award for design, construction, and financing of a capital project over a contractually defined period; and in which the ownership and title of the capital project shall be conveyed at any time to the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

“Design-build-finance-operate” means a built-to-suit project delivery method in which the chief purchasing officer enters into a single procurement and contract award for design, construction, financing, and operation of a capital project over a contractually defined period; and in which the ownership and title of the capital project shall be conveyed at any time to the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 98, § 14, effective June 24, 2003.

56.8163.
Built-to-suit selection committee.

A built-to-suit selection committee is hereby created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The selection committee shall participate in every instance of the cabinet acquiring space through built-to-suit.

The initial selection committee shall consist of the following eight (8) members:

One (1) merit employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet, shall serve a one (1) year term.

One (1) merit employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet, shall serve a two (2) year term.

One (1) merit employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet, shall serve a three (3) year term.

Except as provided for in subsection (4) of this section, two (2) merit employees of the agency seeking the space, appointed by the head of that agency, shall serve for the duration of the built-to-suit process involving their agency.

One (1) merit employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts, appointed by the Auditor, shall serve as a nonvoting member of the committee for a four (4) year term.

One (1) private citizen, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet, shall serve a one (1) year term.

One (1) private citizen, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet, shall serve a two (2) year term.

If the agency seeking the space does not operate under a merit system, the head of the agency shall appoint two (2) agency employees to the selection committee who shall serve for the duration of the built-to-suit process involving their agency.

All selection committee members shall have experience which qualifies them to serve on the committee.

This paragraph shall apply to selection committee members other than those appointed by the head of the agency seeking the space. After the initial terms established in subsection (3) of this section have expired, all subsequent terms shall last four (4) years, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the term. A selection committee member may succeed himself. He shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or replacement, in the case of a vacancy during an unexpired term, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.

A selection committee member appointed by the head of the agency seeking the space shall serve for the duration of the built-to-suit process involving his agency, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the expiration of the process shall be appointed for the remainder of the process. In the case of a vacancy during an unexpired term, a replacement shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

56.8165.
Administrative support for selection committee.

For administrative purposes, the selection committee shall be attached to the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The cabinet shall provide the selection committee with:

Suitable quarters in Frankfort, Kentucky, in which to conduct its business;

An executive secretary and any other staff support necessary for the expeditious conduct of the selection committee’s duties and responsibilities; and

Office supplies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.